Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-637
Birth or death certificates; amendment; evidence required.

All other amendments to vital records made during the first year, unless otherwise provided in sections 71-630 and 71-635 to 71-644, shall be supported by (1) an affidavit setting forth information to identify the certificate, the incorrect data as it is listed on the certificate, and the correct data as it should appear; and (2) one item of documentary evidence supporting the amendment. Certificates amended by this procedure shall be marked amended.

Laws 1971, LB 245, § 4.